Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

403.876.
Application and construction of KRS 403.800 to 403.880.

In applying and construing KRS

403.800

to

403.880

, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 133, § 39, effective July 13, 2004.

403.878.
Transitional provisions.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before July 13, 2004, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

Custody decrees previously registered in this state under the provisions of KRS

403.400

to

403.620

shall be deemed registered under the provisions of KRS

403.800

to

403.880

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 133, § 40, effective July 13, 2004.

403.880.
Short title for KRS 403.800 to 403.880.

KRS

403.800

to

403.880

may be cited as the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 133, § 41, effective July 13, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Graham, Domestic Relations, 71 Ky. L.J. 445 (1982-83).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition for Declaration of Invalidity of Marriage (Mental Incapacity), Form 252.01.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Custody of Children, § 26.1.